Hawaii statutes.
[§453-53] Information sheet.
The department of health shall develop and, upon request, distribute to health
professionals subject to this part an information sheet that includes all of
the following:

(1) A description of expedited partner therapy and its
purpose;

(2) A notice that an individual who has been treated
for a sexually transmitted disease should be retested after treatment to detect
possible persistent or recurrent infection, including information on the timing
of retesting, as recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention;

(3) A warning about the possible dangers of
administering antibiotic therapy to a pregnant individual;

(4) Information about antibiotics dispensed or
prescribed and dosages of those antibiotics dispensed or prescribed, as
recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention;

(5) A warning about the risk of allergies to and drug
interactions with the antibiotics described in paragraph (4);

(6) Information about sexually transmitted diseases,
the treatment of sexually transmitted diseases, and the prevention of sexually
transmitted diseases;

(7) A notice that the patient and the patient's
partners should abstain from sexual activity for seven days after the patient
and the partners have completed the antibiotic therapy;

(8) A notice that the partners should be tested for
sexually transmitted diseases;

(9) A notice of the risk to the patient, the
partners, and others, including the public health, if a sexually transmitted
disease is not completely treated;

(10) A notice of the responsibility of the patient to
notify sexual partners of the risk of sexually transmitted diseases and the
importance of examination and treatment for sexually transmitted diseases; and

(11) A statement advising any individual who has any
questions regarding anything in the information sheet to contact a health
professional or the department of health. [L 2013, c 250, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next